North Carolina, session 2025, SB670.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§143-59.5. Purchase of small unmanned aircraft from covered foreign entities.
(a) Neither the State nor any political subdivision of the State shall purchase or otherwise
acquire any small, unmanned aircraft system manufactured or assembled by a covered foreign
entity. No State funds may be used in connection with the purchase or acquisition of any small,
unmanned aircraft system manufactured or assembled by a covered foreign entity, including any
State funds provided through a contract, grant, or cooperative agreement.
(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) Covered foreign entity. – An individual, foreign government, or party that
meets one or more of the following criteria:
a. Is on the United State's Consolidated Screening List or Entity List.
b. Is domiciled in the People's Republic of China or the Russian
Federation.
c. Is under the influence or control of the government of the People's
Republic of China or the Russian Federation.
d. Is a subsidiary or affiliate of an individual, government, or party of the
People's Republic of China or the Russian Federation.
(2) Small, unmanned aircraft system. – An unmanned, powered aircraft that meets
all of the following criteria:
a. Is operated without the possibility of direct human intervention from
on or within the aircraft.
b. Can be expendable or recoverable.
c. Weighs less than 55 pounds, including the weight of anything attached
to or carried by the aircraft.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to small,
unmanned aircraft purchased on or after July 1, 2027.
*S670-v-1*